zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 調理烘焙鍋具 > 烘焙用具: 烤盤工具組; 烘焙紙; 麵包烤模; 烤肉平底盤; 蛋糕模具; 瑪芬/糕點模具; 派/法式鹹派模具; 披薩烤盤; 烘焙石板; 烘烤用碗盤; 煎鍋
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Posode za kuhanje in peko > Posode za peko: Kompleti posode za peko; Pladnji za pecivo in piškote; Pekači in modeli za kruh; Plošče za pečenje na žaru; Pekači in modeli za torte; Pekači za mafine in pecivo; Pekači za pite in kiš; Pekači za pice; Kamni za pice; Ramekini in posodice za sufle; Pekači z rešetko
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Matlagnings- og bakeutstyr > Bakeutstyr: Bakesett; Bake- og kakeark; Brødpanner og -former; Ovnspanner; Kakepanner og -former; Muffinsformer; Pai- og quicheformer; Pizzabrett; Pizzasteiner; Ramekiner og souffléformer; Langpanner
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Főzőedények és sütőedények > Sütőedények: Sütőedénykészletek; Sütő- és sütilapok; Kenyérserpenyők és -formák; Grillserpenyők; Süteményformák; Muffin- és tésztaformák; Pite- és quiche-formák; Pizzaformák; Pizzakövek; Ramekin- és szufléételek; Sütőedények
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Kochgeschirr & Backformen > Backformen: Backzubehörsets; Back- & Plätzchenbleche; Brotbackformen; Grillbleche mit Fettpfannen; Kuchenbackformen; Muffin- & Gebäckformen; Kuchen- & Quichebackformen; Pizzableche; Pizzasteine; Auflaufförmchen & Souffléförmchen; Bräter
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 조리/제빵 도구 > 제빵 도구: 제빵도구 세트; 베이킹/쿠키 판; 빵팬 및 빵틀; 구이 팬; 케이크 틀; 머핀/페이스트리 틀; 파이/키시 팬; 피자 팬; 피자 스톤; 라미킨/수플레 용기; 구이용 팬
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Matériel de cuisson et de pâtisserie > Moules à pâtisserie: Lots de moules à pâtisserie; Plaques à pâtisserie; Moules à pain; Grilloirs; Moules à gâteaux; Moules à muffins et pâtisserie; Moules à tarte et quiche; Moules à pizza; Pierres à pizza; Ramequins et moules à soufflés; Plats à rôtir
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Verktyg för matlagning och bakning > Bakningsverktyg: Verktygsset för bakning; Ugnsplåtar; Brödformar; Stekplåtar; Bakformar; Muffinsplåtar; Paj- och quicheplåtar; Pizzaformar; Pizzastenar; Pastej- och suffléformar; Stekfat
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 炊具/烘焙用具 > 烘焙用具: 烘培用具套装; 烘焙盘; 面包模具; 烧烤盘; 蛋糕模具; 松饼/糕点烤盘; 花边烤盘; 披萨烤盘; 披萨石; 烤盅/蛋奶酥烤碗; 烤盘
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Kaitlentės ir orkaitės indai > Orkaitės indai: Orkaitės indų rinkiniai; Kepimo ir sausainių lakštai; Duonos formos; Kepimo orkaitėje keptuvės; Tortų formos; Keksiukų ir kepinių formos; Pyragų ir kišų formos; Picos keptuvės; Picos akmenys; Ramekinai ir suflė indai; Skrudinimo keptuvės
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Utensílios para cozinhar e fazer bolos > Utensílios para fazer bolos: Conjuntos de utensílios para fazer bolos; Folhas para fazer bolos e bolachas; Panelas e formas para pão; Tabuleiros para forno; Formas para bolos; Formas para muffins e doces; Formas para tartes e quiches; Formas para pizza; Pedras para pizza; Formas e pratos para suflé; Assadeiras
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Articole pentru gătit și copt > Forme de copt: Seturi de forme de copt; Tăvi de copt și tăvi pentru fursecuri; Tăvi și forme pentru copt pâine; Tăvi pentru rumenit; Tăvi și forme pentru prăjituri; Tăvi pentru brioșe și produse de patiserie; Tăvi pentru plăcintă și quiche; Tăvi pentru pizza; Pietre pentru pizza; Boluri ramekin și boluri pentru sufleu; Tăvi pentru friptură
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная и жаропрочная посуда > Жаропрочная посуда: Наборы жаропрочной посуды; Противни для выпечки; Формы для хлеба; Противни-гриль; Формы для тортов; Формы для кексов и маффинов; Формы для открытых пирогов; Противни для пиццы; Камни для пиццы; Рамекины и формы для суфле; Противни для запекания
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Cookware & Bakeware > Bakeware: Bakeware Sets; Baking & Cookie Sheets; Bread Pans & Molds; Broiling Pans; Cake Pans & Molds; Muffin & Pastry Pans; Pie & Quiche Pans; Pizza Pans; Pizza Stones; Ramekins & Souffle Dishes; Roasting Pans
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Posuđe za kuhanje i pečenje > Posuđe za pečenje: Kompleti posuđa za pečenje; Limovi za pečenje i kolačiće; Plehovi i kalupi za kruh; Grill tave; Plehovi i kalupi za kolače; Plehovi za muffine i slastice; Plehovi za pite i quiche; Plehovi za pizzu; Kamenovi za pečenje pizze; Porculanske zdjelice za pečenje i posude za souffle; Tave za pečenje
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Panelas e assadeiras > Assadeiras: Conjuntos para assadeiras; Travessas para assar; Formas para pães; Grelhas de forno; Formas e moldes para bolos; Formas para muffins e bolos pequenos; Formas para tortas e quiches; Formas para pizza; Pedras para pizza; Pratos para ramequin e suflê; Formas para assar
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nấu và nướng > Dụng cụ nướng: Bộ đồ nướng; Khay nướng bánh; Khuôn bánh mỳ; Chảo nướng; Khuôn làm bánh; Khuôn làm bánh xốp; Khuôn bánh tròn; Đế nướng pizza; Đá pizza; Đĩa nướng bánh; Chảo quay
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Σκεύη μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Σκεύη ζαχαροπλαστικής: Σετ σκευών ζαχαροπλαστικής; Ταψιά ψησίματος & μπισκότων; Φόρμες & καλούπια ψωμιού; Ταψιά ψησίματος στο γκριλ; Φόρμες & καλούπια κέικ; Φόρμες για μάφιν & ζύμες; Φόρμες για πίτες & κις; Φόρμες για πίτσα; Πέτρες ψησίματος πίτσας; Πιάτα ραμεκίν & σουφλέ; Ταψιά ψησίματος
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Nádoby na varenie a pečenie > Nádoby na pečenie: Súpravy na pečenie; Plechy na pečenie; Formy na chlieb; Grilovacie panvice; Formy na koláče; Formy na muffiny a pečivo; Formy na koláče a quiche; Panvice na pizzu; Kamene na pizzu; Zapekacie misky; Pekáče
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Pentolame e tegami da forno > Tegami da forno: Set accessori da forno; Carta da forno e per biscotti; Teglie e stampi per pane; Pentole per griglia; Teglie e stampi per torte; Teglie per muffin e tortine; Teglie per torte e quiche; Teglie per pizza; Pietre per pizza; Piatti per soufflé e ramekin; Teglie per arrosto
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivontatarvikkeet > Leivonta: Leivontatarvikesetit; Uunipellit; Leipävuuat; Parilat; Kakkuvuuat ja -muotit; Muffini- ja leivosvuuat; Piirakkavuuat; Pizzapannut; Pizzakivet; Keraamiset kupit ja kohokaskupit; Paistovuuat
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Ocak ve Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri > Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri: Fırında Pişirme Gereci Setleri; Fırında Pişirme ve Kurabiye Kağıtları; Ekmek Tavaları ve Kalıpları; Kavurma Tavaları; Kek Tepsileri ve Kalıpları; Kek ve Hamur İşi Tavaları; Pasta ve Quiche Tavaları; Pizza Tavaları; Pizza Taşları; Peynirli Tart ve Sufle Tabakları; Derin Fırın Tepsileri
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Съдове за готвене и печене > Съдове за печене: Комплекти за печене; Тави за печене на сладки и бисквити; Тави и форми за хляб; Тигани за запичане; Форми за торта; Форми за мъфини и сладкиши; Тави за пай и киш; Тави за пица; Каменни плочи за пица; Рамекини и купички за суфле; Тигани за печене
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Kookgerei en bakvormen > Bakproducten: Sets voor bakproducten; Bakvellen; Broodblikken en -vormen; Braadpannen; Cakevormen en -blikken; Muffin- en cakevormen; Taart- en quichevormen; Pizzapannen; Pizzastenen; Ramekins en souffléschaaltjes; Braadsledes
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > 調理器具 > ベイクウェア: オーブンウェアセット; 天板・オーブンシート; パン焼き型; ブロイラーパン; ケーキ焼き型; マフィン型; パイ型・タルト型; ピザプレート; ピザストーン; ココット・スフレ型; ローストパン
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios para cocinar y para hornear > Utensilios para hornear: Juegos de utensilios para hornear; Bandejas para hornear galletas; Moldes para pan; Bandejas para grill; Moldes para tartas; Moldes para magdalenas; Moldes para quiche y tarta; Moldes para pizza; Piedras para pizza; Fuentes para soufflé y quesadillas; Bandejas para hornear
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Nádobí na vaření a pečení > Nádobí na pečení: Sady na pečení; Formy na pečení a bábovky; Pánve a formy na pečení chleba; Grilovací pánve; Dortové formy; Formy na dortíky a koláčky; Formy na koláče; Plechy na pizzu; Kameny na pizzu; Nádobí na přípravu sýrů a suflé; Pánve na pečení masa
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Kogegrej og bageforme > Bageforme: Bageforme – sæt; Bageark; Brødforme; Grillpander; Kageforme; Muffin- og cupcakeforme; Tærteforme; Pizzapander; Pizzasten; Ramekiner og souffléforme; Bradepander
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Garnki i formy do pieczenia > Formy do pieczenia: Zestawy form do pieczenia; Blachy do pieczenia; Formy i foremki do chleba; Tace do podgrzewania bezpośrednio na ogniu; Formy do ciasta; Foremki do muffinów lub babeczek; Formy do tarty i kiszu; Formy do pizzy; Kamienie do pizzy; Kokile; Brytfanny
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ทำอาหารและอุปกรณ์อบอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ในการอบ: ชุดอุปกรณ์การอบ; ถาดอบและทำคุกกี้; ถาดและเบ้าหล่อขนมปัง; ถาดสำหรับย่าง; ถาดและเบ้าหล่อเค้ก; ถาดมัฟฟินและขนมอบ; ถาดพายและคีช; ถาดพิซซ่า; หินอบพิซซ่า; จานเล็กที่เข้าเตาอบได้; ถาดปิ้งย่าง